hu: Fésűfogtávolság: Extra széles; Finom; Közepes; Vegyes; Keskeny; Széles; Egyéb
el: Απόσταση δοντιών χτένας: Εξαιρετικά πλατιά; Λεπτές; Μέση; Ανάμεικτο; Στενό; Ευρυγώνιος; Άλλο
zh-CN: 梳齿间距: 超宽齿; 细; 中度; 混合; 窄; 宽; 其他
sk-SK: Rozostup zubov hrebeňa: Extra široké; Jemný; Stredný; Zmiešaný; Úzky; Široký; Iné
ko: 빗살 간격: 매우 넓은; 고운; 중간; 혼합; 좁음; 넓음; 기타
fi: Kamman hampaiden väli: Erittäin harva; Hieno; Keskimääräinen; Sekoitettu; Kapea; Leveä; Muu
pt-BR: Espaçamento dos dentes do pente: Extra largo; Fino; Médio; Mix; Estreito; Largo; Outro
nb: Kamtannavstand: Ekstra bred; Fint; Middels; Blandet; Smal; Bred; Annet
bg-BG: Разстояние между зъбите на гребена: Много широко; Фина; Средна; Смесен; Тесни; Широк; Други
it: Spaziatura dei denti del pettine: Extra largo; Fine; Medio; Misto; Stretta; Larga; Altro
en: Comb tooth spacing: Extra wide; Fine; Medium; Mixed; Narrow; Wide; Other
es: Espaciado de los dientes del peine: Extra ancho; Fino; Medio; Mezcla; Angosto; Ancho; Otros
tr: Tarak diş aralığı: Ekstra geniş; İnce; Orta; Karışık; Dar; Geniş; Diğer
da: Kammens tandafstand: Ekstra bred; Fint; Medium; Blandet; Smal; Bred; Andet
sl-SI: Razmik zob glavnika: Zelo široki; Fino; Medij; Mešan; Ozek; Širok; Drugo
pl: Rozstaw zębów grzebienia: Bardzo szerokie; Drobny; Średni; Mieszane; Wąski; Szerokość; Inne
sv: Kamtandavstånd: Extra bred; Fint; Medium; Blandad; Smal; Vid; Övrigt
lt-LT: Šukų dantų tarpai: Ypač platus; Ploni; Vidutinis; Maišytas; Siauri; Platūs; Kita
hr-HR: Razmak zuba češlja: Ekstra široki; Tanka; Polusuho; Miješani; Uski; Široki kroj; Ostalo
ja: くし歯間隔: エクストラワイド; 細挽き; 中挽き; ミックス; ナロー; ワイド; その他
cs: Rozestup zubů hřebenu: Extra široké; Jemný; Střední; Míchaná; Úzké; Široké; Jiné
fr: Espacement des dents du peigne: Extra large; Fin; Moyen; Mixte; Étroit; Large; Autre
vi: Khoảng cách răng lược: Cực rộng; Mịn; Vừa; Hỗn hợp; Hẹp; Rộng; Khác
ru: Расстояние между зубцами расчески: Очень широкие; Тонкий; Средний; Смешанный; Узкие; Широкие; Другой
pt-PT: Espaçamento dos dentes do pente: Extra largo; Moagem fina; Moagem média; Mistura; Estreito; Largo; Outro
zh-TW: 梳齒間距: 超寬齒; 細; 中等; 混合; 狹窄; 寬; 其他
nl: Tandafstand kam: Extra breed; Fijn; Medium; Gemengd; Smal; Breed; Andere
ro-RO: Spațierea dinților pieptenelui: Extra larg; Subțire; Medie; Amestecat; Îngust; Lat; Altele
de: Kammzahnabstand: Extra breit; Fein; Mittel; Gemischt; Eng; Weit; Sonstiges
th: ระยะห่างฟันหวี: กว้างพิเศษ; ละเอียด; ปานกลาง; ผสม; แคบ; กว้าง; อื่นๆ